Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7543.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-47 of the General Laws entitled "Internet Access and Advertising
by Facsimile" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-47-2.1. Accessibility and ability to determine artificial intelligence generated
images.
(a) Any and all video, image, or photography generated by artificial intelligence or "AI"
that is uploaded, created, distributed or originated from within the State of Rhode Island and is
posted on or to a public platform or that is posted from outside of the State of Rhode Island and is
viewable in Rhode Island shall contain a marking disclosing that the video image or photograph
has been generated by AI.
(b) As used in this section "artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a machine-based system
that undertakes analysis, reasoning and problem-solving, and that can be used to generate
predictions, recommendations, photographs, videos, or other content.
(c) Any person or entity violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section for profit,
or for trade as defined in § 6-13.1-1, shall be deemed to have engaged in a deceptive trade practice
in violation of chapter 13.1 of title 6 and shall be subject to a civil penalty pursuant to the provisions

of §6-13.1-8.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004085
========
LC004085 - Page 2 of 3